vi: Vật liệu kèn Tuba: Đồng thau vàng kim; Niken bạc; Đồng thau đỏ; Bạc sterling; Đồng thau vàng; Khác
es: Material para el tubo de plomo de la tuba: Latón dorado; Alpaca; Latón rojo; Plata de ley; Latón amarillo; Otro
lt-LT: Tūbos švino vamzdžio medžiaga: Auksinis žalvaris; Naujasidabris; Raudonas žalvaris; Sterlingo sidabras; Geltonas žalvaris; Kita
th: วัสดุท่อเป่าทูบา: โกลด์บราส; นิกเกิลซิลเวอร์; เรดบราส; เงินแท้; เยลโลบราส; อื่นๆ
da: Materiale i tuba-leadpipe: Guldmessing; Nysølv; Rødmessing; Sterlingsølv; Gulmessing; Andet
bg-BG: Материал на мундщуковата тръба на тубата: Златен месинг; Алпака; Червен месинг; Стерлингово сребро; Жълт месинг; Друг
nb: Materiale i tubaens munnrør: Gullmessing; Nysølv; Rødmessing; Sterlingsølv; Gulmessing; Annet
pt-PT: Material do tubo de entrada da tuba: Latão dourado; Alpaca; Latão vermelho; Prata de lei; Latão amarelo; Outro
cs: Materiál nátrubkové trubice tuby: Zlatá mosaz; Alpaka; Červená mosaz; Sterlingové stříbro; Žlutá mosaz; Ostatní
ja: チューバリードパイプ材質: ゴールドブラス; ニッケルシルバー; レッドブラス; スターリングシルバー; イエローブラス; その他
nl: Tuba leadpipe materiaal: Goudmessing; Nieuwzilver; Roodmessing; Sterlingzilver; Geelmessing; Anders
zh-TW: 低音號吹口管材質: 金黃銅; 白銅; 紅黃銅; 925 純銀; 黃銅; 其他
en: Tuba leadpipe material: Gold brass; Nickel silver; Red brass; Sterling silver; Yellow brass; Other
hu: Tuba befúvócsövének anyaga: Aranyréz; Alpakka; Vörösréz; Sterling ezüst; Sárgaréz; Egyéb
ro-RO: Materialul tubului principal al tubei: Alamă aurie; Alpaca; Alamă roșie; Argint veritabil; Alamă galbenă; Altele
sk-SK: Materiál náustku tuby: Zlatá mosadz; Alpaka; Červená mosadz; Šterlingové striebro; Žltá mosadz; Iný
pl: Materiał rurki ustnikowej tuby: Złoty mosiądz; Nowe srebro; Czerwony mosiądz; Srebro szterlingowe; Żółty mosiądz; Inne
sv: Material för tubans ledningsrör: Guldmässing; Nysilver; Rödmässing; Sterlingsilver; Gulmässing; Annat
fr: Matériau de la branche d’embouchure du tuba: Laiton doré; Maillechort; Laiton rouge; Argent massif; Laiton jaune; Autre
sl-SI: Material ustnikovne cevi tube: Zlata medenina; Novo srebro; Rdeča medenina; Srebro sterling; Rumena medenina; Drugo
ru: Материал входного трубопровода тубы: Золотистая латунь; Нейзильбер; Красная латунь; Стерлинговое серебро; Желтая латунь; Другое
ko: 튜바 리드파이프 소재: 골드 브라스; 니켈 실버; 레드 브라스; 스털링 실버; 옐로 브라스; 기타
zh-CN: 大号吹嘴管材料: 金黄铜; 镍银; 红黄铜; 标准纯银; 黄铜; 其他
tr: Tuba ağızlık borusu malzemesi: Altın pirinç; Nikel gümüş; Kırmızı pirinç; Som gümüş; Sarı pirinç; Diğer
de: Material des Tuba-Mundrohrs: Goldmessing; Neusilber; Rotmessing; Sterlingsilber; Gelbmessing; Sonstiges
hr-HR: Materijal olovne cijevi tube: Zlatna mjed; Novo srebro; Crvena mjed; Sterling srebro; Žuta mjed; Ostalo
el: Υλικό κύριου σωλήνα τούμπας: Χρυσός ορείχαλκος; Αλπακάς; Ερυθρός ορείχαλκος; Ασήμι 925; Κίτρινος ορείχαλκος; Άλλο
pt-BR: Tuba material do tudel: Latão dourado; Alpaca; Latão vermelho; Prata de lei; Latão amarelo; Outro
it: Materiale per canneggio della tuba: Ottone dorato; Alpacca; Ottone rosso; Argento sterling; Ottone giallo; Altro
fi: Tuuban suukappaleen materiaali: Kultamessinki; Uushopea; Punamessinki; Sterling-hopea; Keltamessinki; Muu